Hawaii statutes.
§560:5-311 Findings; order of appointment.
(a) The court may:

(1) Appoint a limited or unlimited guardian for a
respondent only if it finds by clear and convincing evidence that:

(A) The respondent is an incapacitated
person; and

(B) The respondent's identified needs cannot
be met by less restrictive means, including use of appropriate and reasonably
available technological assistance; or

(2) With appropriate findings, treat the petition as
one for a protective order under section 560:5-401, enter any other appropriate
order, or dismiss the proceeding.

(b) The court, whenever feasible, shall grant
to a guardian only those powers necessitated by the ward's limitations and
demonstrated needs and make appointive and other orders that will encourage the
development of the ward's maximum self-reliance and independence.

(c) Within fourteen days after an appointment,
a guardian shall send or deliver to the ward and to all other persons given
notice of the hearing on the petition a copy of the order of appointment,
together with a notice of the right to request termination or modification;
provided that, for good cause shown, the court may extend time for the order
and notice to be sent or delivered to the ward, or otherwise modify or waive
that requirement.

(d) [Subsection effective January 1, 2017.]
The court shall forward to the Hawaii criminal justice data center all orders
of appointment or information from all orders of appointment as requested by
the Hawaii criminal justice data center, which in turn shall forward the
information to the Federal Bureau of Investigation, or its successor agency,
for inclusion in the National Instant Criminal Background Check System
database. The orders of appointment or information shall also be maintained by
the Hawaii criminal justice data center for disclosure to and use by law
enforcement officials for the purpose of firearms permitting or registration
pursuant to chapter 134. This subsection shall apply to all orders appointing
a guardian of an incapacitated person without regard to the date of the
appointment. [L 2004, c 161, pt of §1; am L 2008, c 39, §5; am L 2016, c 19, §2]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next